Hawaii, session 2025, HB1379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 453-4.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§453-4.5  Foreign medical graduates; alternative qualifications.  Notwithstanding section 453-4(b)(2)(B), a graduate of a foreign medical school [who has passed] may be licensed by the Hawaii medical board under section 453-4(c) if the graduate: (1)  Passed the Federation Licensing Examination (FLEX) or the United States Medical Licensing Examination (USMLE), or a combination of these examinations as approved by the board, with scores deemed satisfactory to the board, passed the qualifying examination of the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates [prior to 1984], and has at least three years of medical training or experience in a hospital approved by the Council on Medical Education and Hospitals of the American Medical Association for internship or residency [may be licensed by the Hawaii medical board under section 453-4(c).]; or (2)  Passed the Federation Licensing Examination (FLEX) or the United States Medical Licensing Examination (USMLE), or a combination of these examinations as approved by the board, with scores deemed satisfactory to the board, possesses an Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates certificate, and has successfully completed two years of post-graduate medical training in an Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education or American Osteopathic Association approved or Canadian program that has been accredited for resident training by the Royal College of Physicians and Surgeons of Canada, or by the College of Family Physicians of Canada; provided that if the post-graduate medical training involves a subspecialty clinical fellowship program, the board may accept post-graduate medical training in a hospital that has an Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education or American Osteopathic Association or accredited Canadian post graduate medical training program in the parent specialty." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.